District of Columbia statutes.
38-1405

Repeal provisions.

All acts and parts of acts enacted prior to May 4, 1896, and all charters obtained by any medical or dental college prior to March 4, 1896, under the general corporation laws in force in said District, so far as inconsistent with this subchapter, are hereby repealed.

May 4, 1896, 29 Stat. 113, ch. 154, § 6
1981 Ed., § 31-1705.
1973 Ed., § 31-905.